Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4282.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 513. (1) The commission may issue to the governing board of a college or university, without regard to the quota provisions of section 531, a license to sell alcoholic liquor for consumption on the premises of a conference center operated by the governing board. Licenses granted under this subsection may be used only for the sale of alcoholic liquor at regularly scheduled conference center activities. The sale of alcoholic liquor to unscheduled patrons or at unscheduled events is prohibited under this subsection. (2) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue a license to a private entity for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the premises of a hotel located on land owned by Central Michigan University if both of the following circumstances exist: (a) The land is leased or subleased at fair market value to a private entity that owns, leases, or subleases the hotel building and its fixtures. (b) The hotel and land are located within an industrial, research, or commercial development park established by the governing board of Central Michigan University. (3) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue a license to a private entity for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the licensed premises of a restaurant located on land owned by Wayne State University if both of the following circumstances exist: (a) The land is leased or subleased at fair market value to a private entity that owns, leases, or subleases the licensed premises for the operation of a restaurant. (b) The restaurant is located within an area designated for industrial, research, or commercial development by the governing board of Wayne State University. (4) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue a license to a private entity for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the licensed premises of a restaurant located on land owned by Western Michigan University if both of the following circumstances exist: (a) The land is leased or subleased at fair market value to a private entity that owns, leases, or subleases the licensed premises for the operation of a restaurant. (b) The restaurant is located within an area designated industrial, research, or commercial development by the governing board of Western Michigan University. (5) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue to the governing board of Northern Michigan University a license for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the licensed premises of a restaurant located on land owned and operated by Northern Michigan University if both of the following apply: (a) The license was originally acquired on the open market at fair market value. (b) The restaurant is located within an area designated for community development or conference activities by the governing board of Northern Michigan University. (6) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue a license to a golf course clubhouse and any adjacent outdoor service area owned or operated by a college or university for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the premises of the golf course clubhouse and any adjacent outdoor service area. (7) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue a license to a private entity for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the premises of a baseball stadium located on land owned by Eastern Michigan University if the baseball stadium and adjacent outdoor service area is leased or subleased at fair market value during the summer period between the end of the universitys spring term and the beginning of its fall term. (8) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue a license to a private entity for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the licensed premises of a restaurant located on land owned by Eastern Michigan University if all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The land is leased or subleased at fair market value to a private entity that owns, leases, or subleases the licensed premises for the operation of a restaurant. (b) The restaurant is located within an area designated for industrial, research, or commercial development by the governing board of Eastern Michigan University. (c) The license was originally acquired on the open market at fair market value. (9) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue a license to a private entity for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the premises of a baseball stadium located on land owned by Oakland University if the baseball stadium and adjacent outdoor service area is leased or subleased at fair market value during the summer period between the end of the universitys spring term and the beginning of its fall term. (10) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue to the governing board of Lake Superior State University a license for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on licensed premises that are located on land owned and operated by Lake Superior State University if both of the following apply: (a) The license was originally acquired on the open market at fair market value. (b) The land is located within an area designated for community development or conference activities by the governing board of Lake Superior State University. (11) Subject to section 531, the commission may issue a license to a private entity for the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the licensed premises of a restaurant located on land owned by Schoolcraft College if all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The land is leased or subleased at fair market value to the private entity that leases or subleases the licensed premises for the operation of a restaurant. The licensed premises described in this subparagraph must be located within or directly adjacent to the licensed premises of the grocery store described in section 533(14). (b) The private entity described in this subsection is the same private entity described in section 533(14). (c) The restaurant is located within an area designated for industrial, research, or commercial development by the governing board of Schoolcraft College. (d) The license was originally acquired on the open market at fair market value. (12) Licenses issued under this section are nontransferable, and the licensee shall pay the fee required under section 525. (13) As used in this section: (a) College or university means a 2-year or 4-year state supported institution of higher education. (b) Conference center means either of the following: (i) A building or portion of a building, other than a student residence hall or student center, that has meeting rooms, banquet areas, social halls, overnight accommodations, and related facilities for special activities scheduled by the college or university, and that, in the judgment of the commission, has been regularly used for conferences and lodging of guests. (ii) Any of the following: (A) The George Gervin GameAbove Center, the corporate education center, Pease Auditorium, the student center, and McKenny Hall at Eastern Michigan University. (B) The Kirkhof and Eberhard Centers at Grand Valley State University. (C) The student center with the name designated by the governing board of Western Michigan University and Heritage Hall Alumni Center at Western Michigan University. (D) The Wadsworth Center at Michigan Technological University. (E) The West Complex, Fredericks Sculpture Museum, and Alumni Building at Saginaw Valley State University. (F) The Woodbridge N. Ferris Building at Grand Rapids and the David L. Eisler Center at Big Rapids of Ferris State University. (G) The Waterman Campus Center at Schoolcraft College. (H) The Mendel Center at Lake Michigan Community College. (I) The McGregor Memorial Conference Center at Wayne State University. (J) The Michigan State University Management Educational Center. (K) The Superior Dome at Northern Michigan University. (L) The Walker Cisler Center, the James Norris Events Center, and the Richard and Theresa Barch Center for Freshwater Research and Education at Lake Superior State University. (M) The Marie Prahl College Center at Mott Community College. (N) The West Hall Innovation Center, the Gerald and Frances Oleson Center, the Dennos Museum Center, and the Great Lakes Campus at Northwestern Michigan College. (O) The Farmhouse at Delta College. (P) The Oakland Community College Culinary Studies Institute. (Q) The Performing Arts and Cultural Center Complex at Macomb Community College. (R) Meadow Brook Hall, Golf Pavilion, Oakland Center, ORena, and Shotwell-Gustafson Pavilion at Oakland University. (S) The John G. Kulhavi Events Center at Central Michigan University. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4595 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor